Missouri, session 2026, HB2776.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 168, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 168.038, to read as follows:
168.038. 1. In addition to granting certificates of license to teach in public
schools of the state under section 168.021, the state board of education shall grant
associate teacher certificates, as provided in this section, to any individual seeking to
teach in grades one through six in any public school in this state.
2. (1) The state board of education shall not grant an associate teacher
certificate under this section to any individual who has not completed a background
check as required under section 168.133.
(2) The state board of education may refuse to issue or renew, suspend, or revoke
any certificate sought or issued under this section in the same manner and for the same
reasons as under section 168.071.
3. (1) The state board of education shall grant a tier I associate teacher
certificate under this section to any individual who has submitted an application to the
state board of education after having completed either:
(a) A state-approved associate of applied science-level teacher preparation
program; or
(b) A teacher preparation program of a substantially similar nature as the
associate of applied science that includes at least sixty semester hours at an accredited
institution of higher education.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2776 2
(2) The teacher preparation program shall:
(a) Include literacy and reading instruction coursework as outlined in subsection
4 of section 161.097;
(b) Be accredited by the state board of education in the same manner that
existing teacher preparation programs are accredited; and
(c) Include a capstone project as a component, which may include passage of the
Missouri general education assessment or a similar institution-created measure to assess
the individual's proficiency in fundamentals of instruction.
(3) A tier I associate teacher certificate issued by the state board of education
under this subsection shall certify the holder to be employed by a school district or
charter school as a teacher of record. Such certificate shall not be renewed and shall
expire four years after issuance.
(4) A holder of a tier I associate teacher certificate shall:
(a) Participate in a mentoring program approved and provided by the school
district or charter school for a minimum of two years; and
(b) Participate in school district or charter school professional development
aligned with the beginning teacher assistance program.
4. (1) In order to qualify for a tier II associate teacher certificate, an individual
who holds a tier I associate teacher certificate shall:
(a) Complete two consecutive years of service in a Missouri public school district
or charter school as a teacher of record;
(b) Successfully achieve an acceptable score on the state-approved teacher
evaluation system from:
a. Seven walk-through evaluations;
b. Two formative evaluations; and
c. One summative evaluation for each of the two probationary years such
individual held a tier I associate teacher certificate; and
(c) Be offered a third contract by a public school of the state.
(2) For an applicant who has a change in job status because of a reduction in the
workforce or a change in life circumstances, the consecutive years of service and score
required under this subsection may be achieved in any school district or charter school
during the four-year nonrenewable tier I associate teacher certificate period.
(3) A tier II associate teacher certificate issued by the state board of education
under this subsection shall certify the holder to be employed by a school district or
charter school for three years. Such certificate shall not be renewed and shall expire
three years after issuance.

HCS HB 2776 3
5. A tier III associate teacher certificate may be issued to a holder of a tier II
associate teacher certificate who has completed three years of service and sixty contact
hours of professional development, which may include hours spent in an appropriate
college curriculum. Tier III associate teacher certificates shall expire after ninety-nine
years from issuance.
6. Holders of a tier I and tier II associate teacher certificate:
(1) Are not eligible for additional certifications under subdivision (7) of
subsection 1 of section 168.021;
(2) Shall be considered employees for the purposes of sections 169.600 to 169.715
and pay into the public education employee retirement system established under
sections 169.600 to 169.715; and
(3) Shall not be considered teachers for the purposes of sections 169.010 to
169.141.

School districts and charter schools shall be required to compensate tier I and II
associate teacher certificate holders at a minimum of thirty-five thousand dollars and
may provide a separate salary schedule for associate teacher certificate holders.
7. (1) A holder of a tier III associate teacher certificate shall be eligible for
additional certifications under subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of section 168.021. Such
additional certification shall be at the determination of the department of elementary
and secondary education, shall only include certifications for early childhood and at the
middle school level, and shall not include certification for special education or at the
high school level.
(2) A holder of a tier III associate teacher certificate shall be considered a
teacher for the purposes of sections 169.010 to 169.141 and pay into the public school
retirement system under sections 169.010 to 169.141.
(3) A holder of a tier III associate teacher certificate who is employed by a school
district or charter school shall be required to be compensated in accordance with the
minimum salary level established under section 163.172. Such compensation may be
included on a separate salary schedule for associate teacher certificate holders.
8. Mentors for tier I associate teacher certificate holders shall meet the
standards established under section 161.375 and shall be provided with additional
compensation which may include additional release time, and shall include sufficient
time for mentors to observe beginning teachers and for the beginning teachers to
observe master teachers, structured to provide multiple opportunities over time and to
minimize the need to require substitute teachers to facilitate observation.

HCS HB 2776 4
9. Beginning ten years after the effective date of the section, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall biennially provide to the joint committee on
education, or any successor committee, a report on the effectiveness of the associate
teacher certification process and make recommendations for legislative changes.
10. The state board of education may exercise the board's authority under
chapter 161 to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
100 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
101 vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
102 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
103 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
104 effective date of this act shall be invalid and void.
✔